Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5024YH (2) 91 ak/jh H.F. 2291 Section 1. Section 22.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, 3 a lawful custodian shall not require payment from a member of 4 the general assembly in connection with the memberâs request to 5 examine or copy a public record that the member has the right 6 to examine pursuant to section 22.2 and subject to section 7 22.7. 8 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 9 3, shall not apply to this Act. 10